Massachusetts, session 194th, H2746.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary the 
Massachusetts Teachers' Retirement Board is hereby authorized and directed to allow Mary 
Donna Nodurf to purchase up to 4 years of creditable service for the purposes of maternity leave 
service; provided that it does not exceed the 80 percent admitted and that no credit shall be 
allowed unless Mary Donna Nodurf, has paid to the teachers’ retirement system, in one sum, 
upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, an amount equal to the deductions 
that would have been withheld had she continued in service, as determined by the board’s rules 
and regulations, together with buyback interest. 

of 2 9  SECTION 2. If Mary Donna Nodurf fails to make payment within one year of the 
effective date of this act, the teachers’ retirement system shall recalculate her invoice using the 
system’s actuarially assumed investment rate of return. 
SECTION 3. Upon completion of payment, the teachers’ retirement system shall 
recalculate Mary Donna Nodurf’s retirement benefit including her maternity leave purchase 
effective as of the date the system received Mary Donna Nodurf’s payment.